Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 7. Shareholders

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 609 to 997.

Causation in private civil actions by minority shareholders under proxy provisions of § 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USCS § 78n(a)) and Securities Exchange Act (SEC) Rules thereunder — post Virginia Bankshares, 137 ALR Fed 293.

18 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 305 to 432.